src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ_ARCHAIC  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

+Use/Marg:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
+Use/Marg:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;

:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;

:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;



LEXICON ADJ_MATALA

0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_ARCHAIC  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:a  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TERÄVÄ

:  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ_ARCHAIC  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;

:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;



LEXICON ADJ_HOIKKA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 k~0 a:e comparative
!!€  hoikka: hoikka+A+Sg+Nom # slim
!!€  hoikkaa: hoikka+A+Sg+Par
!!€  hoikkana: hoikka+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  hoikassa: hoikka+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  hoikkina: hoikka+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hoikissa: hoikka+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  hoikkien: hoikka+A+Pl+Gen
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_MYKKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 k~0 ä:e comparative
!!€  mykkä: mykkä+A+Sg+Nom # mute
!!€  mykkää: mykkä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  mykkänä: mykkä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  mykässä: mykkä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mykkinä: mykkä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  mykissä: mykkä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  mykkien: mykkä+A+Pl+Gen
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_POPPA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 p~0 a:e comparative
!!€  poppa: poppa+A+Sg+Nom # hocus-pocus
!!€  poppaa: poppa+A+Sg+Par
!!€  poppana: poppa+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  popassa: poppa+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  poppina: poppa+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  popissa: poppa+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  poppien: poppa+A+Pl+Gen
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HÖMPPÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 p~0 ä:e comparative
!!€  hömppä: hömppä+A+Sg+Nom # bogus
!!€  hömppää: hömppä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  hömppänä: hömppä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  hömpässä: hömppä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  hömppinä: hömppä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hömpissä: hömppä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  hömppien: hömppä+A+Pl+Gen
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  The quantitative k and t gradations are not found for adjectives with this
!!  a stem.

LEXICON ADJ_VOIPA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 p~v a:e comparative
!!€  voipa: voipa+A+Sg+Nom # capable
!!€  voipaa: voipa+A+Sg+Par
!!€  voipana: voipa+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  voivassa: voipa+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  voipina: voipa+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  voivissa: voipa+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  voipien: voipa+A+Pl+Gen
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:va  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:v  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ve  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:v  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KÄYPÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 p~v ä:e comparative
!!€  käypä: käypä+A+Sg+Nom # "good enough"
!!€  käypää: käypä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  käypänä: käypä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  käyvässä: käypä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  käypinä: käypä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  käyvissä: käypä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  käypien: käypä+A+Pl+Gen
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:vä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:v  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ve  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:v  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  The t:d is missing from this a stem.

LEXICON ADJ_MÄTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 t~d ä:e comparative
!!€  mätä: mätä+A+Sg+Nom # rotten
!!€  mätää: mätä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  mätänä: mätä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  mädässä: mätä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mätinä: mätä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  mädissä: mätä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  mätien: mätä+A+Pl+Gen
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:dä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:d  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:d  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_SANKA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 k~g a:e comparative
!!€  sanka: sanka+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  sankaa: sanka+A+Sg+Par
!!€  sankana: sanka+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  sangassa: sanka+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  sankina: sanka+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  sangissa: sanka+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  sankien: sanka+A+Pl+Gen
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ga  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:g  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VÄNKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 k~g ä:e comparative
!!€  vänkä: vänkä+A+Sg+Nom # goofy
!!€  vänkää: vänkä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  vänkänä: vänkä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  vängässä: vänkä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  vängissä: vänkä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  vänkiin: vänkä+A+Pl+Ill
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:gä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:g  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:gä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:g  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aikaansaapa+A:aikaansaa  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
auttava+A:auttav  ADJ_MATALA  ;
epäherkkä+A:epä#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
estävä+A:estäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
haarova+A:haarov  ADJ_MATALA  ;
hallanarka+A:hallan#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
hanakka+A:hanak  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
hankala+A:hankal  ADJ_MATALA  ;
herkkä+A:herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
hermoherkkä+A:hermoherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
hermoherkkä+A:hermo#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
hiipivä+A:hiipiv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
hintava+A:hintav  ADJ_MATALA  ;
houkka+A:houk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
hupa+A:hu  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hylkivä+A:hylkiv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
hyvinvoipa+A:hyvinvoi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hyvinvoipa+A:hyvin#voi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hyvänsuopa+A:hyvänsuo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hyvänsuopa+A:hyvän#suo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hyytävä+A:hyytäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
hyötyvä+A:hyötyv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
häälyvä+A:häälyv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
hömppä+A:hömp  ADJ_HÖMPPÄ  ;
ihmisarka+A:ihmis#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
istuva+A:istuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
itkevä+A:itkev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
jyrkkä+A:jyrk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
jäntterä+A:jäntter  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
järkeenkäypä+A:järkeenkäy  ADJ_KÄYPÄ  ;
jäykkä+A:jäyk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
kaareva+A:kaarev  ADJ_MATALA  ;
kaikkivoipa+A:kaikkivoi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
kattava+A:kattav  ADJ_MATALA  ;
kestävä+A:kestäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
kiittävä+A:kiittäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
kiriherkkä+A:kiriherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
kiriherkkä+A:kiri#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
kirkuva+A:kirkuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
kiverä+A:kiver  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
kiverä+A:kiver  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
kolkka+A:kolk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
kumara+A:kumar  ADJ_MATALA  ;
kuuromykkä+A:kuuro#myk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
kylmänarka+A:kylmän#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
kysyvä+A:kysyv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
kärkevä+A:kärkev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
käypä+A:käy  ADJ_KÄYPÄ  ;
laatuunkäypä+A:laatuunkäy  ADJ_KÄYPÄ  ;
laulava+A:laulav  ADJ_MATALA  ;
lentävä+A:lentäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
liikaherkkä+A:liikaherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
likomärkä+A:likomär  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
luiseva+A:luisev  ADJ_MATALA  ;
lämpöherkkä+A:lämpöherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
läpimärkä+A:läpi#mär  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
lättänä+A:lättän  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
lättänä+A:lättän  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
menevä+A:menev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
menoisa+A:menois  ADJ_MATALA  ;
muuttuva+A:muuttuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
mykkä+A:myk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
märkä+A:mär  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
mätä+A:mä  ADJ_MÄTÄ  ;
nähtävä+A:nähtäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
omantunnonarka+A:omantunnonar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
osuva+A:osuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
pahansuopa+A:pahansuo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
pahansuopa+A:pahan#suo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
pahansuopa+A:pahansuo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
pahoinvoipa+A:pahoinvoi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
pakkasenarka+A:pakkasen#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
parka+A:par  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
perivä+A:periv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
piukka+A:piuk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
pohtiva+A:pohtiv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
poppa+A:pop  ADJ_POPPA  ;
puolijäykkä+A:puolijäyk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
pyylevä+A:pyylev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
raaka+A:raa  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
rauhaisa+A:rauhais  ADJ_MATALA  ;
raukka+A:rauk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
retevä+A:retev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
räjähdysherkkä+A:räjähdysherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
salliva+A:salliv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
sanatarkka+A:sanatark  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
sanka+A:san  ADJ_SANKA  ;
seppä+A:sep  ADJ_HÖMPPÄ  ;
silkka+A:silk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
sotiva+A:sotiv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
suhdanneherkkä+A:suhdanneherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
synkkä+A:synk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
syrjivä+A:syrjiv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
syöpä+A:syö  ADJ_KÄYPÄ  ;
säkkärä+A:säkkär  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
säkkärä+A:säkkär  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
säteilyarka+A:säteily#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
sävyisä+A:sävy#is  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
taantuva+A:taantuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
tiukka+A:tiuk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
toistuva+A:toistuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
tuliterä+A:tuliter  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
tuliterä+A:tuli#ter  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
tunneherkkä+A:tunne#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
tunnontarkka+A:tunnon#tark  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
turvaisa+A:turvais  ADJ_MATALA  ;
tuulenarka+A:tuulen#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
tylppä+A:tylp  ADJ_HÖMPPÄ  ;
täpärä+A:täpär  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
uutuudenjäykkä+A:uutuuden#jäyk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
vaivaama+A:vaivaam  ADJ_MATALA  ;
valoherkkä+A:valo#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
valonherkkä+A:valon#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
vankka+A:vank  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
varvunhoikka+A:varvun#hoik  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
veiterä+A:veiter  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
veiterä+A:veiter  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
vihlova+A:vihlov  ADJ_MATALA  ;
vikkelä+A:vikkel  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
voipa+A:voi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
vänkä+A:vän  ADJ_VÄNKÄ  ;
yliherkkä+A:yli#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
ylävä+A:yläv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
äkkijyrkkä+A:äkki#jyrk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
